Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 2. Game and Fish Commission

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d Fish and Game § 44.

36A C.J.S. Fish § 26; 38 C.J.S. Game §§ 45, 46.

§ 23-1-201.
Composition; appointment; terms; oath.

The Wyoming game and fish commission is continued in existence.

The commission shall be composed of eight (8) members including the governor as an ex officio member. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the appointed commissioners shall be of the same political party, and all appointed commissioners shall have a general knowledge of wildlife and wildlife propagation, management, and control.

Commencing in 1973, a commissioner shall be appointed from each appointment district pursuant to W.S.

9-1-218

.

Commissioners shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate for a term of six (6) years to commence March 1, except the first term for two (2) appointees shall be two (2) years and for two (2) appointees shall be four (4) years as designated by the governor prior to submission to the senate. Terms of current appointees are ratified and continued in existence until terms of new appointees under this section become effective. The governor shall fill any vacancy as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

.

Each commissioner shall execute and file the oath of office as prescribed by the Wyoming constitution with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, §§ 4, 9; 1943, ch. 112, § 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 47-104, 47-109; Laws 1953, ch. 55, § 1; 1955, ch. 127, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 23-9, 23-14; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-6; Laws 1977, ch. 21, § 2; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to general powers and duties of commission, see §§

23-1-301

to

23-1-303

.

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20, 21, Wyo. Const.

The 2016 amendment

,
effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent of
the” for “four (4) of the seven (7)” in the second
sentence of (b).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 5, made the act effective upon passage. Approved March 9, 1973.

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 state as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be
deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority,
board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments
in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after
the effective date of this act.”

Stated

in

O'Brien v. State, 711 P.2d 1144,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1986); County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Parker Land and Cattle Company v. Wyoming Game and Fish Commission, 845 P.2d 1040,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Reserving Wildlife for Resident Consumption: Is the Dormant Commerce Clause the Outfitters' White Knight?,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 125 (1997).

§ 23-1-202.
Removal of members.

The governor may remove any commissioner as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 47-105; W.S. 1957, § 23-10; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-7; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 23-1-203.
Compensation and expenses.

Commissioners shall receive seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per day but not more than four thousand dollars ($4,000.00) per year as salary for attendance at commission meetings and other meetings related to department business in their official capacity as commissioners. Commissioners shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses incurred in performance of their official duties in the same manner and amount as state employees.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 6; 1943, ch. 112, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 47-106; W.S. 1957, § 23-11; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-8; 2003, ch. 43, § 1.